Wyoming statutes. Title 21 Education
Chapter 3 School Districts in General

Annual report card. —

Laws 1990, ch. 122, § 7, provides that each school district shall annually compile and release to the public a report card on the performance of the school district.

School district not entitled to eleventh amendment immunity. —

Although a school district obtains more than one-fourth of its funds from the state of Wyoming, the school district on balance is not entitled to an eleventh amendment immunity as an arm of the state of Wyoming. Stoddard v. School Dist., 429 F. Supp. 890, 1977 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 16623 (D. Wyo. 1977), aff'd in part and rev'd in part, 590 F.2d 829, 1979 U.S. App. LEXIS 17844 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1979).

Since school board is more like county than arm of state. —

The characteristics of Wyoming school districts demonstrate that in Wyoming on balance a local school board is more like a county or city than it is like an arm of the state. Stoddard v. School Dist., 429 F. Supp. 890, 1977 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 16623 (D. Wyo. 1977), aff'd in part and rev'd in part, 590 F.2d 829, 1979 U.S. App. LEXIS 17844 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1979).

Law reviews. —

For article, “The Wyoming Education Code of 1969,” see V Land & Water L. Rev. 531 (1970).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

68 Am. Jur. 2d Schools §§ 15 to 50.

Power of school district to employ counsel, 75 ALR2d 1339.

78 C.J.S. Schools and School Districts §§ 14 to 17, 78 to 171.